Utah statutes.
19-6-505.   Long-term agreements for joint action -- Construction,
acquisition, or sale of interest in management facilities -- Issuance of
bonds.
(1) (a)  Two or more public entities, which for the purposes of this section
shall only include any political subdivision of the state, the state and its
agencies, and the United States and its agencies, may enter into long-term
agreements with one another pursuant to Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal
Cooperation Act, and any one or more public entities may enter into long-term
agreements with any private entity or entities for joint or cooperative action
related to the acquisition, construction, ownership, operation, maintenance,
and improvement of solid waste management facilities, regardless of whether
the facilities are owned or leased by a public entity or entities, private
entity or entities, or combination of them and pursuant to which solid waste
of one or more public entities, any private entity or entities, or combination
of them, are made available for solid waste management pursuant to the terms,
conditions, and consideration provided in the agreement.
(b)  Any payments made by a public entity for services received under the
agreement are not an indebtedness of the public entity within the meaning of
any constitutional or statutory restriction, and no election is necessary for
the authorization of the agreement.
(c)  Any public entity or any public entity in combination with a private
entity agreeing to make solid waste management facilities available may, in
the agreement, agree to make available to other public entities a specified
portion of the capacity of the solid waste management facilities, without
regard to its future need of the specified capacity for its own use and may in
the agreement agree to increase the capacity of its solid waste management
facilities from time to time, as necessary, in order to take care of its own
needs and to perform its obligations to the other parties to the agreement.
(2) (a)  Two or more public entities or any one or more public entities
together with any private entity or entities may construct or otherwise
acquire joint interests in solid waste management facilities, or any part of
them, for their common use, or may sell to any other public or private entity
or entities a partial interest or interests in its solid waste management
facility.
(b)  Any public entity otherwise qualifying under Title 11, Chapter 14, Local
Government Bonding Act or Title 11, Chapter 17, Utah Industrial Facilities and
Development Act may issue its bonds pursuant to these acts for the purpose of
acquiring a joint interest in solid waste management facilities, or any part
thereof, whether the joint interest is to be acquired through construction of
new facilities or the purchase of an interest in existing facilities.
